Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.070

Revolving fund created.

There is created in the office of the state superintendent of public instruction a revolving fund to be designated the surplus and donated food commodities revolving fund.

[ 1985 c 341 s 10; 1979 ex.s. c 20 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.040. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.30.040, 28.30.040.]